West Virginia, session 2025, SB14.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 22. Environmental Resources. Article 15. Solid Waste management Act. §22-15-25. Secondary metals recycler permit to purchase nonferrous metals; permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals; violations; penalties; records; notice; preemption; rulemaking. (a) Definitions. — For purposes of this section:"Coil" means a copper, aluminum, or aluminum-copper condensing coil or evaporation coil. The term includes, but is not limited to, coil from a commercial or residential heating or air-conditioning system. The term does not include coil from a window air-conditioning system, if the coil is contained within the system, or coil from an automobile condenser."Fixed site" means a site occupied by a secondary metals recycler as the owner of the site or as a lessee of the site under a lease or other rental agreement providing for occupation of the site by a secondary metals recycler for a total duration of not less than 364 days."Nonferrous metals" means metals not containing significant quantities of iron or steel, including, but not limited to, copper wire, copper-clad steel wire, copper pipe, copper bars, copper sheeting, aluminum other than aluminum cans, a product that is a mixture of aluminum and copper, catalytic converters, lead-acid batteries, steel propane gas tanks, and stainless steel beer kegs or containers."Secondary metals recycler" means a person or entity who is engaged, from a fixed site or otherwise, in the business of paying compensation for nonferrous metals that have served their original economic purpose, whether or not the person is engaged in the business of performing the manufacturing process by which nonferrous metals are converted into raw material products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential economic value.(b) Permit required for secondary metal recycler. — (1) A secondary metals recycler shall obtain a permit to purchase nonferrous metals. A secondary metals recycler’s employee is not required to obtain a separate permit to purchase nonferrous metals: Provided, That the employee is acting within the scope and duties of their employment with the secondary metals recycler. A secondary metals recycler’s employee who intends to purchase nonferrous metals on behalf of the secondary metals recycler at a location other than a fixed site shall have a copy of the secondary metals recycler’s permit readily available for inspection.(2) If a secondary metals recycler intends to purchase nonferrous metals at a fixed site or fixed sites, the secondary metals recycler shall obtain a permit from the sheriff of the county in which each of the secondary metals recycler’s fixed sites are located. The sheriff may issue the permit to the secondary metals recycler, if the secondary metals recycler:(A) Has a fixed site or fixed sites in any county or counties of this state;(B) Has not been convicted of a violation of §61-3-45b or this section; and(C) Declares on an application provided by the sheriff that the secondary metals recycler is informed of and shall comply with this section.(3) If a secondary metals recycler intends to purchase nonferrous metals at a location other than a fixed site, the secondary metals recycler shall obtain a permit from the sheriff for each county in which the secondary metals recycler intends to purchase nonferrous metals. The sheriff may issue the permit to the secondary metals recycler if the secondary metals recycler:(A) Can sufficiently demonstrate to the sheriff the secondary metals recycler’s ability to comply with the provisions of this section;(B) Has not been convicted of a violation of §61-3-45b or this section; and(C) Declares on an application provided by the sheriff that the secondary metals recycler is informed of and shall comply with this section.(4) The Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police, in cooperation with the West Virginia Sheriff’s Bureau of Professional Standards, shall develop uniform applications and permits.(5) The sheriff may investigate a secondary metals recycler’s background prior to issuing a permit for purposes of determining if the secondary metals recycler qualifies to be issued a permit.(6) The sheriff may charge and retain a $200 fee for each permit.(7) The sheriff shall keep a record of all permits issued containing, at a minimum, the date of issuance, and the name and address of the secondary metals recycler.(8) A permit is valid for 24 months.(9) A permit may be denied, suspended, or revoked at any time if the sheriff discovers that the information on an application is inaccurate, a secondary metals recycler does not comply with the requirements of this section, or a secondary metals recycler is convicted of a violation of §61-3-45b or this section.(10) The sheriff shall issue permits during regular business hours.(11) The sheriff shall, immediately after the permit is issued, provide the Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police a copy of the approved application. The sheriff shall provide to the Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police, at any time so requested, a certified list of all permits issued in the county. The Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police shall maintain a registry of all secondary metals recyclers who have been issued permits.(c) Permit required to transport materials. — (1) A person or entity who wants to transport or sell nonferrous metals to a secondary metals recycler shall obtain a permit to transport and sell the nonferrous metals from the sheriff. An entity’s employee is not required to obtain a separate permit to transport or sell nonferrous metals: Provided, That the employee is acting within the scope and duties of their employment with the entity. An entity’s employee who intends to transport and sell nonferrous metals on behalf of an entity shall have a copy of the entity’s permit readily available for inspection.(2) If a person is a resident of West Virginia or an entity is located in West Virginia, the person or entity shall obtain a permit from the sheriff of the county in which the person resides or has a secondary residence or in which the entity is located or has a secondary business. The sheriff may issue the sheriff to the person or entity if the person:(A) Resides or has a secondary residence, or the entity is located or has a secondary business in any county of this state;(B) Or entity has not been convicted of a violation of §61-3-45b or this section; and(C) Or entity declares on an application provided by the sheriff that the person or entity is informed of and shall comply with this section and §61-3-45b.(3) If a person is not a resident of West Virginia or an entity is not located in West Virginia, the person or entity shall obtain a permit from the sheriff of any county. The sheriff may issue the permit to the person or entity if the person:(A) Is not a resident of West Virginia or the entity is not located in West Virginia;(B) Or entity has not been convicted of a violation of §61-3-45b or this section; and(C) Or entity declares on an application provided by the sheriff that the person or entity is informed of and shall comply with this section and §61-3-45b.(4) The Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police, in cooperation with the West Virginia Sheriff’s Bureau of Professional Standards, shall develop uniform applications and permits.(5) The sheriff may investigate a secondary metals recycler’s background prior to issuing a permit for purposes of determining if the secondary metals recycler qualifies to be issued a permit.(6) The sheriff may not charge a fee for a permit under this subsection. The sheriff may charge a $10 fee to replace a permit that has been lost or destroyed. If the original permit is later found by the person or entity, the person or entity shall turn the original permit into the sheriff or destroy the original permit.(7) The sheriff shall keep a record of all permits issued containing, at a minimum, the date of issuance, the name and address of the person or entity, a photocopy of the person’s identification or of the employee’s identification, and the person’s photograph or the entity’s employee’s photograph.(8) A permit is valid statewide and expires on the person’s birth date on the second calendar year after the calendar year in which the permit is issued, or, if the permittee is an entity, the permit expires on the date of issuance on the second calendar year after the calendar year in which the permit is issued.(9) A permit may be denied, suspended, or revoked at any time if the sheriff discovers that the information on an application is inaccurate, a secondary metals recycler does not comply with the requirements of this section, or a secondary metals recycler is convicted of a violation of §61-3-45b or this section.(10)(A) It is unlawful for a person or entity to obtain a permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals for the purpose of transporting or selling stolen nonferrous metals.(B) A person who violates a provision of this subdivision, in this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined in an amount determined by the court or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned. The person’s or entity’s permit shall be revoked.(11) The sheriff shall issue permits during regular business hours.(12) The sheriff shall, immediately after the permit is issued, provide the Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police a copy of the approved application. The sheriff shall provide to the Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police, at any time so requested, a certified list of all permits issued in the county. The Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police shall maintain a registry of all persons or entities who have been issued permits.(d) Limitations on purchasing nonferrous metals. — (1) It is unlawful to purchase nonferrous metals in any amount for the purpose of recycling the nonferrous metals from a seller unless the purchaser is a secondary metals recycler who has a valid permit to purchase nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and the seller has a valid permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. A secondary metals recycler may hold a seller’s nonferrous metals while the seller obtains a permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.(2) A secondary metals recycler shall maintain a record containing, at a minimum, the date of purchase, the name and address of the seller, a photocopy of the seller’s identification, a photocopy of the seller’s permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals, if applicable, the license plate number of the seller’s motor vehicle, if available, the seller’s photograph, the weight and size or other description of the nonferrous metals purchased, the amount paid for the nonferrous metals, and a signed statement from the seller stating that the seller is the rightful owner or is entitled to sell the nonferrous metals being sold. If the secondary metals recycler has the seller’s photograph on file, the secondary metals recycler may reference the photograph on file without taking a photograph for each transaction: Provided, That the secondary metals recycler shall update the seller’s photograph on an annual basis. A secondary metals recycler may use a video of the seller in lieu of a photograph provided the secondary metals recycler maintains the video for at least 120 days. A secondary metals recycler may maintain a record in an electronic database provided that the information is legible and can be accessed by the sheriff upon request.(3) All nonferrous metals that are purchased by and are in the possession of a secondary metals recycler and all records required to be kept by this subsection shall be maintained and kept open for inspection by the sheriff, or his or her designee, or local and state governmental agencies during regular business hours. The records shall be maintained for one year from the date of purchase.(4) A secondary metals recycler may not enter into a cash transaction in payment for the purchase of copper, catalytic converters, or beer kegs, totaling $25 or more. Payment for the purchase of copper, catalytic converters, or beer kegs, which totals $25 or more shall be made by check alone issued and made payable to the seller. A secondary metals recycler may neither cash a check issued pursuant to this item nor use an automated teller machine (ATM) or other cash card system in lieu of a check. A secondary metals recycler may not enter into more than one cash transaction per day per seller in payment for the purchase of copper, catalytic converters, or beer kegs.(5) A secondary metals recycler shall prominently display a 20-inch by 30-inch sign in the secondary metals recycler’s fixed site that states: "NO NONFERROUS METALS, INCLUDING COPPER, MAY BE PURCHASED BY A SECONDARY METALS RECYCLER FROM A SELLER UNLESS THE SELLER IS A GAS, ELECTRIC, COMMUNICATIONS, WATER, PLUMBING, ELECTRICAL, OR CLIMATE CONDITIONING SERVICE PROVIDER, OR THE SELLER PRESENTS THE SELLER’S VALID PERMIT TO TRANSPORT AND SELL NONFERROUS METALS ISSUED PURSUANT TO §22-15-25 OF THE CODE OF WEST VIRGINA."(6) A purchaser who violates a provision of this subsection:(A) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $200 nor more than $300 or confined in jail not more than 30 days;(B) For a second offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $400 nor more than $500 or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined; and(C) For a third offense or subsequent offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or confined in jail not more than three years, or both fined and confined. For an offense to be considered a third or subsequent offense, only those offenses that occurred within a period of 10 years, including, and immediately preceding the date of the last offense, shall constitute a prior offense within the meaning of this subsection.If the purchaser obtained a permit to purchase nonferrous metals pursuant to subsection (b), the permit shall be revoked.(e) Limitations on selling nonferrous metals. — (1) It is unlawful to sell nonferrous metals in any amount to a secondary metals recycler unless the secondary metals recycler has a valid permit to purchase nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and the seller has a valid permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.(2) A seller who violates a provision of this subsection:(A) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined in an amount determined by the court or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined;(B) For a second offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $500 or confined in jail not more than three years, or both fined and confined; and(C) For a third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $1,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned.If the seller obtained a permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals pursuant to subsection (c), the permit shall be revoked.(3) It is unlawful to purchase or otherwise acquire nonferrous metals in any amount from a seller who does not have a valid permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section with the intent to resell the nonferrous metals in any amount to a secondary metals recycler using the purchaser’s valid permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.(4) A purchaser who violates a provision of this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined an amount determined by the court or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned. The purchaser’s permit shall be revoked.(f) Holds on stolen nonferrous metals. — (1) When a law-enforcement officer has reasonable cause to believe that any item of nonferrous metal in the possession of a secondary metals recycler has been stolen, the law-enforcement officer may issue a hold notice to the secondary metals recycler. The hold notice shall be in writing, be delivered to the secondary metals recycler, specifically identify those items of nonferrous metal that are believed to have been stolen and that are subject to the notice, and inform the secondary metals recycler of the information contained in this subsection. Upon receipt of the notice, the secondary metals recycler may not process or remove the items of nonferrous metal identified in the notice, or any portion thereof, from the secondary metal recycler’s fixed site for 15 calendar days after receipt of the notice unless released prior to the 15-day period by the law-enforcement officer.(2) No later than the expiration of the 15-day period, a law-enforcement officer may issue a second hold notice to the secondary metals recycler, which shall be an extended hold notice. The extended hold notice shall be in writing, be delivered to the secondary metals recycler, specifically identify those items of nonferrous metal that are believed to have been stolen and that are subject to the extended hold notice, and inform the secondary metals recycler of the information contained in this subsection. Upon receipt of the extended hold notice, the secondary metals recycler may not process or remove the items of nonferrous metal identified in the notice, or any portion thereof, from the secondary metals recycler’s fixed site for 30 calendar days after receipt of the extended hold notice unless released prior to the 30-day period by the law- enforcement officer.(3) At the expiration of the hold period or, if extended, at the expiration of the extended hold period, the hold is automatically released, and the secondary metals recycler may dispose of the nonferrous metals unless other disposition has been ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.(4) A secondary metals recycler who violates a provision of this subsection:(A) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $200 nor more than $300 or confined in jail not more than 30 days;(B) For a second offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than $400 nor more than $500 or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined; and(C) For a third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or confined in jail not more than three years, or both fined and confined. For an offense to be considered a third or subsequent offense, only those offenses that occurred within a period of 10 years, including, and immediately preceding the date of the last offense shall constitute a prior offense within the meaning of this subsection.The secondary metals recycler’s permit to purchase nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be revoked.(g) Transporting nonferrous metals on highways. — (1) It is unlawful to transport nonferrous metals in a vehicle or have nonferrous metals in a person’s possession in a vehicle on the highways of this state, except:(A) The person can present a valid permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; or(B) The person can present a valid bill of sale for the nonferrous metals.(2) If a law-enforcement officer determines that one or more of the exceptions listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection applies, or the law-enforcement officer determines that the nonferrous metals are not stolen goods and are in the rightful possession of the person, the law- enforcement officer may not issue a citation for a violation of this subsection.(3) A person who violates a provision of subdivision (1) of this subsection:(A) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $200 or confined in jail not more than 30 days;(B) For a second offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $500 or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined; and(C) For a third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or confined in jail not more than three years, or both fined and confined.  For an offense to be considered a third or subsequent offense, only those offenses that occurred within a period of 10 years, including, and immediately preceding the date of the last offense, shall constitute a prior offense within the meaning of this subsection.(4) If a person transports nonferrous metals that the person knows are stolen in a vehicle or has in the person’s possession in a vehicle on the highways of this state nonferrous metals that the person knows are stolen, is operating a vehicle used in the ordinary course of business to transport nonferrous metals that the person knows are stolen, presents a valid or falsified permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals that the person knows are stolen, or presents a valid or falsified bill of sale for nonferrous metals that the person knows to be stolen, the person is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned. If the person obtained a permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the permit shall be revoked.(h) For purposes of this section, the only acceptable identification is valid:(1) West Virginia driver’s license issued by the Division of Motor Vehicles;(2) West Virginia identification card issued by the Division of Motor Vehicles;(3) A driver’s license from another state that contains the licensee’s picture on the face of the license; or(4) A military identification card.(i) A secondary metals recycler shall not purchase or otherwise acquire:(1) An iron or steel manhole cover;(2) An iron or steel drainage grate; or(3) A coil, unless the seller is an exempted entity pursuant to subsection (j) of this section or the seller presents a bill of sale from a company indicating that the seller acquired the coil as the result of a unit replacement or repair. The bill of sale is sufficient proof of ownership and serves the same purpose as a permit to transport and sell nonferrous metals. A person who presents a falsified bill of sale is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined an amount determined by the court or confined in jail not more three years, or both fined and confined.(j) Exemptions. — (1) Except as provided, the provisions of this section do not apply to:(A) The purchase or sale of aluminum cans;(B) A transaction between a secondary metals recycler and another secondary metals recycler;(C) A governmental entity;(D) A manufacturing or industrial vendor that generates or sells regulated metals in the ordinary course of its business;(E) A seller who is a holder of a retail license, an authorized wholesaler, an automobile demolisher, a contractor, a real estate broker or property manager, a residential home builder, a demolition contractor, a provider of gas service, electric service, communications service, water service, plumbing service, electrical service, climate conditioning service, core recycling service, appliance repair service, automotive repair service, or electronics repair service; or(F) A seller that is an organization, a corporation, or an association registered with the state as a charitable organization or a nonprofit corporation.(2) An exempted entity listed in subdivision (j)(1) of this section is subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (10) of subsection (c) of this section.A secondary metals recycler shall maintain a record of transactions involving exempted entities listed in subdivision (j)(1) of this section pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and is subject to the penalty provisions of subsection (d) of this section. Any item of nonferrous metals acquired from an exempted entity listed in subdivision (j)(1) of this section is subject to a hold notice pursuant to (f) of this section.(k) This section preempts local ordinances and regulations governing the purchase, sale, or transportation of nonferrous metals in any amount, except to the extent that such ordinances pertain to zoning or business license fees. Political subdivisions of the state may not enact ordinances or regulations more restrictive than those contained in this section.(l) The Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police shall propose rules pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. to effectuate the provisions of this section and carry out the intent of this section. Chapter 61. Crimes and their Punishment. Article 3. Crimes against Property. §61-3-45b. Obtaining nonferrous metals unlawfully; disruption of communication or electrical service. (a) For purposes of this section, "nonferrous metals" means metals not containing significant quantities of iron or steel, including, but not limited to, copper wire, copper clad steel wire, copper pipe, copper bars, copper sheeting, aluminum other than aluminum cans, a product that is a mixture of aluminum and copper, catalytic converters, lead-acid batteries, steel propane gas tanks, and stainless steel beer kegs or containers.(b) It is unlawful for a person to willfully and maliciously cut, mutilate, deface, or otherwise injure any personal or real property, including any fixtures or improvements, for the purpose of obtaining nonferrous metals in any amount.(c) A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of a:(1) Misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined in an amount determined by the court or confined in jail not more than three years, or both fined and confined, if the direct injury to the property, the amount of loss in value to the property, the amount of repairs necessary to return the property to its condition before the act, or the property loss, including fixtures or improvements, is less than $5,000; or(2) Felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined in an amount determined by the court or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned, if the direct injury to the property, the amount of loss in value to the property, the amount of repairs necessary to return the property to its condition before the act, or the property loss, including fixtures or improvements, is $5,000 or more.(d)(1) A person who violates the provisions of this section and the violation results in great bodily injury to another person is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 15 years. For purposes of this subsection, "great bodily injury" means bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes serious, permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.(2) A person who violates the provisions of this section and the violation results in the death of another person is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 30 years.(e) A person who violates the provisions of this section and the violation results in disruption of communication or electrical service to critical infrastructure or more than 10 customers of the communication or electrical service is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall in an amount determined by the court or confined in jail not more than three years, or both fined and confined.(f) If a person is convicted of violating the provisions of this section and the person has been issued a permit pursuant to §22-15-25, the permit shall be revoked.(g)(1) A public or private owner of personal or real property is not civilly liable to a person who is injured during the theft or attempted theft, by the person or a third party of nonferrous metals in any amount.(2) A public or private owner of personal or real property is not civilly liable for a person’s injuries caused by a dangerous condition created as a result of the theft or attempted theft of nonferrous metals in any amount, of the owner when the owner of personal or real property did not know and could not have reasonably known of the dangerous condition.(3) This subsection does not create or impose a duty of care upon an owner of personal or real property that would not otherwise exist under common law.